North Carolina, session 2025, SB157.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) in nonrecurring
funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to provide a directed grant to Johnson C. Smith University to
support the University's Inclusive Tech-Innovation Pilot Project to create a vibrant and connected
community that leverages broadband to support economic growth and prosperity within the
anchor community.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*S157-v-1*